Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
Number of Reviews
24

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trailers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
In 1987, Charlie Sheen's character in WALL STREET asked his mentor Gordon
Gekko "how much was enough?". Gekko responded: "It's not a question of
enough, pal. It's a zero sum game, somebody wins, somebody loses. Money
itself isn't lost or made, it's simply transferred from one perception to
another." A great film for the 80s, but with day-trading, dot-com mania and
a bullish market running rampant today, the question that now plagues the
gang in this similarly themed flick is "how far would you go?". And what I
want to know is...does greed still work?
PLOT:
A young man caught between an overbearing father and his lust for the big
money, gets a plush gig at an off-Wall Street brokerage house, and quickly
becomes one of their top men on the phones. Unfortunately for the young lad,
he soon discovers that the firm itself isn't as kosher as he was originally
told.
CRITIQUE:
Just call it GLENGARRY GLENROSS JR. or the SON OF WALL STREET since this
film is nothing more than a modern-day remake of these two great films with
some hipper-than-thou dialogue tossed around for kicks, an over-the-top rap
soundtrack and several strong performances from its young cast of male
hotshots. Giovanni Ribisi is one who has also been known as a solid actor in
my neck of the woods, but hopefully this starring gig will get him the
widespread recognition that he deserves. Ben Affleck pulls an "Alec Baldwin
in Glengarry" cameo as the tough-as-nails supervisor who comes in every now
and again and busts everybody's balls with a solid delivery and fun style.
It's pretty obvious from his demeanor that he just loved playing this role!
And boy, did he have some doozy lines to deliver. Vin Diesel is another
standout as the man on the inside who kind of takes Ribis under his wing
when he first joins the mini-Billionaire Boys Club. In fact, I would say
that it was probably the combination of the great cast, tasty dialogue and
interesting professional milieu that made this film so much more
entertaining for me. Mind you, I have a background and degree in business,
so there may be some bias on my part here : )
Now if you're looking for an original story, well this film just ain't for
you. This tale follows the standard premise of any film which has the
sympathetic innocent character from the outside being pulled into a (what
seems like) once in a lifetime opportunity, only to find out that it's
actually not as great an opportunity as once led to believe. This film tries
to add some feelers with a back-story about Ribisi's cold hearted dad
affecting his behavior, which only slightly worked for me, and the fruition
of a romance between Ribi and a secretary, which should just have been left
on the cutting room floor, but all in all, I was entertained throughout this
film and thoroughly enjoyed the open references to the former films
mentioned above. One thing I still don't understand is how studios keep
trying to satisfy the most common denominator in films like this by adding a
token romance for the obvious female target crowd, when in reality all that
they are doing is taking the focus away from an interesting story set inside
a highly toxic male testosterone environment. Stick to the story at hand
folks, and they will come! Anyway, I still don't think that this film will
particularly appeal to the female demographic since the focus of the film is
basically on a bunch of spoiled, loud, brash, erect male penises out to make
a million, but then again, does that really sound inviting to anyone? Well,
I certainly enjoyed it plenty and it sure does give you a little more
insight into the mighty worlds of cold-callers and stock dealers. So if you
like all that sales lingo, don't mind the basic storyline, love the actors
and enjoy well-written dialogue, then by all means, put this film on your
list of to do's over the next weekend or so.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Actors Vin Diesel and Giovanni Ribisi co-starred alongside one another in
Spielberg's 1998 war drama SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (8/10). Diesel was also the
voice of the "iron giant" in 1999's THE IRON GIANT (5/10), and has written
and directed two films of his own, MULTI-FACIAL and STRAYS, which were
screened at the 1995 Cannes Film Festival and 1997 Sundance Film Festival
respectively.
Giovanni Ribisi's birth name is Antonio Giovanni Ribisi. He is a member of
the Church of Scientology.
Ben Affleck's middle name is Geza. He reportedly received only $7,000 to
star in Kevin Smith's CHASING AMY, but went on to pocket $600,000 for his
role in ARMAGEDDON (8/10).
Scott Caan is the son of actor James Caan. He is also a screenwriter in his
own right, having recently sold the rights to his script CHASING THE PARTY:
HOW HUGH HEFNER SAVED MY LIFE to mega-producer Jerry Bruckheimer. The film
is apparently slated for production in early 2000, with Caan attached to
star.
Despite DAZED AND CONFUSED being Nicky Katt's breakthrough role, it is to be
noted that he also played a schoolchild in 1984's GREMLINS.
Writer/director Ben Younger makes his feature film directorial debut with
this film. He is a 27-year old Brooklynite who attended the City University
of New York studying in political science, and put himself through school by
working as a stand-up comic. After becoming the youngest campaign manager in
NY City, he switched from politics to filmmaking, and came up with the idea
for this script when he was recruited as a boiler room trainee himself.
What is a "boiler room"? It's a brokerage firm that houses a bunch of
hard-working, smart-mouthed kids off the streets who pressure their
cold-call customers any which way they can into buying stock in unknown or
bogus companies for huge commissions. Once the price of the stock is driven
high enough, insiders sell, making fortunes for themselves and often wiping
out the savings of innocent investors. They are seductive, secretive firms
where only those trained and recruited to be loyal are allowed inside.
Recently, the North American Securities Administrators Association made
prosecuting boiler rooms a top priority.

Author
Ross Anthony
An excellent narrative lead-in brings us up to speed on our main character's
motivations. Giovanni Ribisi isn't about to slip into the conventional work
week only to trudge the rest of his life for a livable salary. Nope, he's a
sharp New York kid and he's going to find a way to make a million bucks some
other way. Even if it's slightly below legal standards.
Enter Ben Affleck (briefly anyway) who can "sell bubble gum to the lockjaw
patients at Bellevue." Giovanni takes the bait, diving into a stock-selling
brokerage of sorts paying larger than seemingly possible commissions to its
obsessed new recruits. It's a young industry as Ben says, "I'm 26 and I'm a
senior citizen."
The bland looking Giovanni is puppy-dog perfect with his attentive, yet
skeptical, always-thinking plain-faced appearance. A very good actor he.
Giovanni's folks aren't so easy to please. The best scenes of the movie are
between he and his judge-dad, "I'm not your best friend, I'm your father."
Giovanni desperately tries to explain his side, his father interrupts, "What
side? You're wrong!"
Vin Diesel also gives a fine performance as the senior partner who takes
Giovanni under his wings.
Backed by rap music, a pretty good script faulters a bit when it rushes the
progress and consequences of one of Ribisi's clients. Still ... quite
entertaining.
Boiler Room. Copyright Š 2000. Rated R.
Starring Giovanni Ribisi, Vin Diesel, Nia Long, Nicky Katt, Scott Caan, Ben
Affleck, Jamie Kennedy, and Ron Rifkin
Writer/Director Ben Younger.
Produced by Team Todd at NewLine.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 2000. Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Bradley Null
filmcritic.com presents a review from staff member Bradley Null.
You can find the review with full credits at
http://www.filmcritic.com/misc/emporium.nsf/2a460f93626cd4678625624c007f2b46/31c4717f6627fb4e88256885001d861a?OpenDocument
 America is the land of opportunity, and now more than ever, the
opportunity that most Americans are preoccupied with is that of easy
money.  Our news media is saturated with stories of the instant
millionaire, 25-year-old startup CEOs worth nine figures or the crafty
investor that bought that startup on IPO and doesn't have to worry too
much about his day job anymore either.  There are a number of powerful
cautionary tales waiting to be drawn from this unwholesome frenzy.
BOILER ROOM tries to tell one of these stories, but sadly it fails to
add much to the greed genre established by its two heavily referenced
predecessors: WALL STREET (1987) and GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS (1992).
 BOILER ROOM is the story of Seth (Ribisi), a 19-year-old college
dropout obsessed with the American dream of easy money.  After
concluding rather quickly that college isn't necessarily the fast track
to a quick buck, he opens up an underground casino out of his house in
Queens, providing a popular service for the local city college kids.
After his disapproving father (Rifkin) finds out about the casino, Seth,
feeling a repressed need to gain his father's approval, looks into an
opportunity to become a stockbroker at the small firm of J.T. Marlin.
 As it turns out, the firm, located in the heart of Long Island,
conspicuously far from Wall Street, is a "chop shop," shorthand for a
brokerage house more interested in pawning off securities for its own
interests rather than serving its customers.  When Seth's father
discovers this, not only does Seth not find the approval he was hoping
for, but he is excommunicated from the family.
 Though he has only a minor part in the film, Ben Affleck is highlighted
in trailers for the film, and the discerning observer will notice a
strong similarity between his scene in the trailer, and Alec Baldwin's
immortalized portrayal of a real estate shark in GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS.
In fact, Affleck's big scene draws heavily on Baldwin's, though his
performance (and the material he has to work with) does not live up to
what is almost universally agreed upon as the best performance of
Baldwin's career.  This is not the only referencing of David Mamet's
portrayal of the dark world of real estate cold-calling in this movie,
however.  Later in the film, when receiving some instructions on how to
cold-call potential customers, Seth is told to remember one of Baldwin's
catch phrases from that scene, "A-B-C.  Always Be Closing."  BOILER ROOM
also liberally references, both directly and indirectly, its direct
predecessor in the "greed is good" category of filmmaking.  Not only
drawing its basic theme and plot structure from WALL STREET, BOILER ROOM
also draws its best dialogue during a scene in which a number of young
stock brokers sitting in one of their sparely decorated mansions,
compete with each other to quote lines from WALL STREET, whose
antagonist, Gordon Gecko, is obviously regarded as an idol within the
group.
 As a movie, BOILER ROOM is moderately entertaining.  Vin Diesel in
particular, off a strong turn in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, turns in a
powerful performance as Chris, one of Seth's mentors at J.T. Marlin.
Sadly though, Ben Younger, in his writing and directorial debut, adds
very little to the filmic pantheon in his own voice.  Even the film's
most prolific statement on the American obsession with getting rich,
"either you're slinging crack rock or you've got a wicked jump shot," is
a quote of the rap star Notorious B.I.G.  The most admirable outcome of
this film might be that it leads viewers to check out its two
predecessors.  I would urge the same as well.
Director: Ben Younger
Producer: Suzanne Todd, Jennifer Todd
Writer: Ben Younger
Starring: Giovanni Ribisi, Ben Affleck, Vin Diesel, Nia Long, Taylor
Nichols, Scott Caan, Ron Rifkin, Tom Everett Scott
--
Christopher Null - cnull@mindspring.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Sean Molloy
People who say that money is the root of all evil have never had any.
So says Jim (Ben Affleck), the trainee whip at the J.T. Marlin
brokerage firm.  Jim is a millionaire.  You, too, will be millionaires
if you come on board, Jim tells an entire roomful of nineteen and
twenty year old guys, and they believe him.  His passionate speeches
and promises of fast money are what draw them in.  The huge houses,
big screen televisions, and expensive cars in the parking lot are what
keep them there.  Among the believers is Seth (Giovanni Ribisi), a kid
who runs a back door casino in his apartment.  Watching these scenes
is all too reminiscent of the brand of cult behavior you'd find at a
recruiting session for a pyramid scheme...  I've seen friends fall
prey to this brand of seductive half-logic, shut themselves off, and
turn into propaganda-spewing sales robots.  Let me assure you, it's
not a pretty sight.
The J.T. Marlin firm is what's known as a chop shop; they use
high-pressure sales tactics to push stocks that don't exist on
faceless people over the telephone.  Its members quote David Mamet's
Glengarry Glen Ross and Oliver Stone's Wall Street as if they were
reading from the Bible, and take every word from these films with
their irony and sarcasm detectors held in the off position with a
piece of duct tape.
To my surprise, there's been an inordinate amount of internet-fueled
backlash against how the characters are trying too hard to sound hip
and cool, and all they accomplish is that they wind up sounding like
posers.  All I can say to that is, well... duh.  Boiler Room shows us
an entire stock-market subculture that's traded individuality for a
quick buck; it presents us with figures that have ceased being people
and have become simple tools to perform a job.  They smack of
phoniness, and we witness through their pathetic attempts at "romance"
and snap bar fights how they can't function in society, but only
amongst themselves and in the context of their work.  There are themes
at work here that are addressed in David Fincher's Fight Club... only
these brokers aren't fighting to break free from societal chains, but
rather to keep themselves from losing them.
Most of the J.T. Marlin family chooses to shut its eyes and plug its
ears against the obvious fact that the firm isn't exactly on the up
and up...  senior broker Chris is one of them (Chris is well played by
Vin Diesel, who also stars in this week's Pitch Black, and the guy
displays an undeniable charisma in both of these films.)
But unlike the others, Seth soon begins to understand the grotesque
machine he has become a part of, and he does not like what he sees.
When his sense of ethics kicks in, he's torn between the huge amounts
of money he stands to make and the fact that he just screwed over a
family man in order to make that money.  He toys with the old
soldiers' adage of "just obeying orders" to try and justify it to
himself, but he eventually realizes he simply can't go on living like
that.
This is where Boiler Room makes its most effective move.  The film
genuinely complicates Seth's motives by making him a kid who, when all
is said and done, simply craves the approval of his father.  This
layer of the movie adds a welcome dimension to what easily could have
been another exercise in tired, generic ethics.  The treatment of
Seth's girlfriend Abby (Nia Long) is another refreshing piece of the
picture.  Their romance seems genuine, the potential interracial
political correctness is held at bay; and as Seth's moral center, she
doesn't simply offer the good and righteous answers - her views are
often as skewed as his own.
My only complaint comes at the end, and it's a trap that too many good
films tend to fall into.  Boiler Room goes a long way to demonstrate
the wrongs Seth has done and how he feels about it - through
interjecting scenes of the people whose lives Seth has destroyed, as
well as through Seth's own actions.  But then the movie decides to
spell out in big, bold letters what we already know, and a character
essentially delivers a sermon on what the audience has already been
effectively shown.  So a note to filmmakers: Subtlety and subtext are
wondrous things, put faith in the intelligence of your audience, and
trust that you got your message across.  Please, I'm begging you,
don't beat me over the head with it.
_____________
Media Junkies - Movie reviews, music, books, games, and more
http://www.mediajunkies.com
E-mail: sean@mediajunkies.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   Pulsating with puissance, throbbing with testosterone,
"Boiler Room" deserves the comment it received from critic
Ray Pride who calls it "a slick, dick-swinging diversion."  A
first feature for writer-director Ben Younger--who spent a year
interviewing workers in our nation's so-called boiler
rooms--this debut is going to be a tough act for the man to
follow.
  The classic movie about the world of stocks and bonds is,
of course, Oliver Stone's 1987 "Wall Street," an unsubtle but
compelling foray into the notion that greed is good.  The
youthful, vibrant, mostly conscience-free brokers in Younger's
movie do not disagree in the slightest.  But "Boiler Room"
brings the highly commercial classic of thirteen years ago
down to a level that could be appreciated by its expected
demographics without dumbing down the plot scheme.  Don't
think that the hip-hop score is thrown in arbitrarily to appeal
to a younger, more urban audience.  The rap music
symbolizes the psychological construct of the players in this
game of chance.  Almost unanimously young, suburban,
white males, they nonetheless picture themselves as a
cosmopolitan, sophisticated, hip and thoroughly modern
group of Wall Street tycoons who just happen to work in the
sticks of Long Island an hour away from the #6 Fulton Street
stop on the IRT Lex line.
   Like Michael Mann's "The Insider," this film aims not
simply at a single industry but serves as an indictment of
American capitalism in general--a system whose viva-yo spirit
of "What's-in-it-for-me-and-damn-the-public" generates big
bucks for the ethically-challenged while destroying the
physical and financial health of its victims.  The CEO's of Big
Tobacco spout long noses with their insistence that their
weed is not addictive: the hustlers selling snake oil miracles
in shady, obscure brokerage houses are their epigonous
disciples.
   In Giovanni Ribisi--who comes across as a mousy guy with
a chip on his shoulder, especially eager to prove
himself to the world--Younger has found the ideal protagonist. 
As Seth David, Ribisi performs in the role of a 19-year-old
college dropout who runs a successful but illegal casino in his
home.  Eager as a puppy to please his acerbic dad Marty
(Ron Rifkin), Seth is determined to show his old man that
though the kid was once brutally smacked by him for falling
from his bicycle and thereafter treated with relative
indifference, he can achieve on his own and make his father
proud.  But Marty, a federal judge, is merely disgusted by the
boy's dabbling in illegal gambling--which he feels threatens
his own respectable position in the judiciary.  When Seth
takes a job as a trainee with a Long Island brokerage house,
J.T. Marlin, he finally succeeds in making his dad proud--for a
time.
   "Boiler Room" follows the fast-moving adventures of this
young and acquisitive everyman in the bowels of the boiler
room, where the trainees are lectured in the style of
"Glengarry Glen Ross"'s honcho (played in that movie by
Alec Baldwin).  Repeatedly cajoled and motivated by the
firm's 27-year-old multi-millionaire, Jim (Ben Affleck) that you
WILL make your first million in three years, these wet-behind-
the-ears agents don't give a damn that the stock they're
pushing is backed by failing or non-existent companies.  The
movie serves as a warning to each of us to resist the
entreaties made by telemarketers--who have an answer for
every rebuttal you can make to their products.  Younger
appears to advise us, when under the hard sell, to "just hang
up" (to paragraph Nancy Reagan), though women who
answer the phone need not worry.  Among this company's
rules is never to "pitch the bitch," that is, never try to sell to
women.  Women are implicitly harder to con than men and
will pester the hell out of the salesmen the first time
something goes wrong with their stock.  As you listen to the
egregiously pushy phone banter of these snake-oil
telemarketers, you've got to get a big charge out of their
sheer cockiness--while simultaneously deploring their white-
collar criminality.
   These young guys may look like suburban wimps, but
Younger makes clear that their high-tension profession instills
them with tough-guy, racist, homophobic attitudes.  They
think nothing of beating up a large dude in a bar who makes
threatening noises to one of their number; they loudly insult a
gay man in Tribeca's trendy Odeon Restaurant; they
exchange ethnic and religious pejoratives to one another on
their work floor; and in more than one instance they act as
though fired up by a Fascist provocateur--marching loudly to
receptions provided by their big boss, Michael (played
charmingly by Tom-Hanks lookalike Tom Everett Scott).
   The movie has some minor flaws.  Seth's dad is
increasingly concerned that his son's illegal casino activities
are a threat to his own position as a federal judge.  However,
we often hear of celebrities whose sons and daughters are
coke-heads--situations irrelevant to their own tenure on the
job.  Also the movie sets a new record for the use of the
most obnoxious of all English-language expressions, "ya-
know"--which is uttered thirty times at the very least.  Other
than these civils, heck, this movie is a gas.
Rated R.  Running Time: 120 minutes.  (C) 2000
Harvey Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Who wants to be a millionaire?  Almost everyone wants to be rich
and most people do not want to really have to work for it.  At least
that is the point of view presented to Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) when he
interviews at brokerage house J. T.  Marlin.  Seth is something of a
disappointment to his father (Ron Rifkin), a Federal Judge.  At about
the age of 18 Seth has quit school and is running an illegal casino out
of his apartment.  One of Seth's customers recruits him to interview at
brokerage house J. T. Marlin where the cash flow is even better--a lot
better.  Seth finds that the offered interview is not to sell himself
to the firm, but more to sell him on the idea of working for the
Marlin.  And the package seems almost too good to be true.  Give the
firm three years of very hard work and they will nearly guarantee to
make him a millionaire.  Who could resist a deal like that?
     Jim Young (Ben Affleck) tells the recruits he himself is 27, which
is almost over the hill in that business.  It is the young people who
are the big traders.  And the financial rewards are terrific.  Seth
sees a chance to be successful and show his father that he has worth.
Almost immediately it seems to be a Faustian bargain.  As Seth is
pulled deeper into this world he makes a visual transition.  Younger
puts him in darker clothing.  Dark suits, dark shirts, even his eyes
seem to darken.  He begins to look like almost gothic or vampirish.  In
a less than subtle manner Younger seems to be suggesting that the life
is being slowly sucked from him.
     Younger shows us the world of these young kids thrown into the
world of finance.  In their expensive suits and with their expensive
cars they give the appearance of respectability and of having class.
Yet over and over Younger makes the point that these are children, and
vulgar ones at that, who do not know what to do with their money.  They
know the neighborhoods to buy expensive homes but in a look inside one
the house seems almost unfurnished except with a few technical toys.
There is almost nothing soft in the house.  Almost everything is
plastic and electronic.  When the dealers go out to bars they behave
little better than teenage gangs.  They live an existence of well-
rewarded banality and conspicuous and ill-considered consumption.
     In order to make the point that the illegal trading is not a
victimless crime we also see a subplot of one investor who is hurt by
the illicit trading.  Still, by concentrating too much on the one
investor the film blunts the point that there are many investors
damaged by the shady firm.  The drama works best in the subplot of the
relation between Seth and his father.  It is in this relationship that
the film has its most moving moments.
     The film borrows heavily from both WALL STREET and GLENGARRY GLEN
ROSS, but it also works both films into the plot.  Ben Affleck is not
only a young model of the ruthless Alec Baldwin character from
GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS, he also quotes him.  Not only is the plot borrowed
from WALL STREET, it also is the traders' favorite film.  The film also
works in a romance that seems gratuitous, but just adds one more
ingredient to the mix.
     The music seems mostly gangsta rock.  This combines with the jerky
editing to give a sort of new wave feel.  The score did not do a lot
for me but underscore the disorientation of dropping into the new world
of brokerage.  (Odd trivia point: I am not sure of the symbolism, but
the opening chords of the closing credit music are borrowed directly
from a recording of the score for GODZILLA VS. MOTHRA (1964).)
     The film is at its best at what should be the hardest task,
interesting the audience in the finances and the trading and at the
same time being educational.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 2000.
Starring Giovanni Ribisi, Vin Diesel, Nia Long, Nicky Katt, Tom Everett
Scott, Ben Affleck, Scott Caan, Ron Rifkin, Jamie Kennedy, Taylor Nichols.
Written by Ben Younger.
Directed by Ben Younger.
Rated R.
After viewing "Boiler Room," I came to an interesting conclusion: Most
movies looking to provide viewers with an "in-depth" portrayal of a
particular profession end up making it look like a pretty lousy job. Either
they take the route of most movies about the teaching profession and show
that, however worthwhile, the job is exceedingly difficult ("Stand and
Deliver," anyone?), or they show you all the nasty, ugly stuff lurking under
the surface that you don't want to see. "Boiler Room" goes for the latter. I
can't think of anyone who would want to be a stockbroker after seeing this
one. Trouble is, the characters in "Boiler Room" take a look at a film
equally critical of the same profession -- Oliver Stone's "Wall Street" --
and find exactly what they are looking for. Huh? Good question. This film
attempts to explain the mentality that leads young men to the high-pressure
world of selling stocks. And though "Boiler Room" doesn't quite work as a
complete piece of cinema, some of its insight into this world is still quite
fascinating.
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) runs a private casino out of his basement. Though he'
s supposed to be in college, he has since dropped out and concentrated
entirely on his new business. Soon, however, Seth's disapproving father (Ron
Rifkin), a judge, discovers his deception and virtually disowns his son.
Seth, desperate to gain his father's respect, takes up a job offer from one
of his customers: A small firm called J.T. Marlin is offering young recruits
instant wealth -- they'll be millionaires within their first three years.
Seth goes to the job "interview," which is more like a recruiting session,
where broker Jim Young (Ben Affleck) delivers forceful speeches designed to
draw the men to the company. After joining the firm as a trainee, Seth finds
 the work hectic and stressful, but still satisfying. He meets his
co-workers, such as Greg (Nicky Katt) and Chris (Vin Diesel), two group
leaders who keep up a friendly stream of insults with each other, Michael
(Tom Everett Scott), the charismatic chairman, and Abby (Nia Long), a
beautiful secretary Seth takes a liking to. He's good at his job and is
finally doing something his father can approve of. But Seth starts noticing
suspicious things about his seemingly gracious employer. J.T. Marlin can
afford to pay its employees exorbitant amounts of cash, strange for such a
small firm. Eventually, he discovers the truth: The firm is a "chop-shop," a
place that sells nonexistent stocks to unwitting customers, and one that is
under investigation by the FBI.
The films which served as Younger's inspiration for "Boiler Room" are quite
evident. His characters quote lines from "Wall Street" and extol the virtues
of "Glengarry Glen Ross," while Younger himself seems to channel David Mamet
when writing his dialogue; his film is full of quintessential Mamet-speak --
curt, profane, and riddled with epithets. Derivative nature aside, most of
these conversations are sharply written, even darkly funny at times. Younger
displays some ironic wit here: These characters are well-to-do white men who
speak like they came from the ghetto. The film utilizes a rap-infested
soundtrack to enforce the notion (and just in case you're wondering, yes,
Younger did start out directing music videos), and many of the scenes in
"Boiler Room" are quite stunning in their effectiveness. The offices at J.T.
Marlin literally are boiling pots of tension, ready to explode at any
moment, and much of the tension is brought in by strong, forceful
performances by two actors: Nicky Katt and Vin Diesel. They aren't the main
characters (though sometimes I wished they were), but the duo bring energy
to the material whenever they arrive on screen. Ben Affleck, playing the
Alec Baldwin part (from "Glengarry"), delivers his monologues quite well.
"Boiler Room" is an interesting film, but the problem is that whatever
interesting points it might have delivered are dulled by the slipshod way
the film has been slapped together. Younger is still inexperienced as a
filmmaker, and his shot selection gets downright monotonous at times:
Practically every conversation is an endless stream of close-ups. But I'm
willing to overlook such faults, as long as the filmmaker has enough
material to keep me interested for the full running time. "Boiler Room" only
has enough to sustain about half a film. The first hour is quite good. We
meet plenty of colorful characters and learn quite a lot about the inner
workings of a firm like J.T. Marlin. But Younger, for all his dedication to
Mamet-style dialogue, forgets that it isn't enough to merely show us what
happens in an office like this, not enough to fill a feature-length film,
anyway. Conversations that seemed insightful in the first half become
tedious in the second. But why? Aren't they essentially the same
conversations? Yes, and it is precisely because they are the same
conversations that they cease to be interesting.  Notice how team leaders
Greg and Chris have the same racially-charged argument every time. Notice
how Ben Affleck delivers what is essentially the same speech no less than
three times. (In "Glengarry," Mamet was wise to have Alec Baldwin show up
once for a stunning and forceful monologue and then resist the temptation to
bring him back for another.) Notice how Seth, the ostensible lead character,
learns almost nothing by the end of the film -- other than that he should've
stuck with his illegal casino business. David Mamet is Younger's
inspiration, but he writes conversations that give us new insight into his
characters each time around; Younger writes conversations that go nowhere by
the time two characters talk to each other a second time. "Boiler Room's"
script is big on introduction, and short on development.
Younger also seems to be afraid of mainstream audiences not "getting" his
film, so he throws in several superfluous subplots that never amount to
much, like the truncated romance between Ribisi and Nia Long. While the film
should be commended for not harping on the interracial nature of the
relationship, it still never gets really interesting. Seth's relationship
with his father sits in neutral for a long while until the film pulls out a
contrived (and unearned) resolution to it. (Ribisi's "breakdown" scene
towards the end isn't the least bit believable.) And what was that about the
FBI sting? Don't even ask. The screenplay has hampered what ought to have
been a character-driven film and saddled it with far too much plot. It also
makes the grave mistake of having the laconic and disinterested Seth as its
lead character, because the film doesn't need a lead character at all. It
would have been better had Younger treated this as an ensemble piece, giving
more screen time to the interesting personalities employed by J.T. Marlin.
Perhaps I'm being too harsh on the film. I didn't hate "Boiler Room." Quite
the opposite, it intrigued me so greatly that I was left wanting more. The
film is good in pieces, particularly a scene where Seth berates a
telemarketer for serving him a lousy sales pitch (don't you wish you could
do that?) and a subplot involving a spineless middle-class family man
(Taylor Nichols) who gets taken for all he's worth by J.T. Marlin. This part
of the film is easily the most effective, portraying and personalizing just
what these "chop-shop" firms do to people. The result is absolutely
disgusting. Younger's film also manages to tap into a late-90's "boom
economy" mentality, one in which young men, having seen computer hackers and
stockbrokers making millions at the drop of a hat, demand their own
substantial slice of the pie. But all these good pieces don't add up to a
coherent whole, and this film ultimately fails, falling apart in a formulaic
and repetitive second half that loses whatever points it had been making.
"Boiler Room" does a lot of nice things; too bad it doesn't manage to do
them for a full two hours.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Author
Jerry Saravia
Recently on television, I had seen a program on the illegal activities of con artists, particularly those involved in get-rick-quick telephone scams. Some of these people operate inside rented offices or apartments and con people out of their hard-earned money, including retired folks who are depending on their savings to survive. The purpose is to obtain any and all money and the key is persuasion. That is the focus of "Boiler Room," which focuses on such con artists, and how they can persuade anyone to sell on fictitious stock options. 
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) is one of these guys. A former casino operator in his own apartment, he quits trying to make amends to please his father, who is disconcerted with the life his son lead. Apparently, Seth lied to his family that he was attending college. All along he had been running an illegal casino making wads of cash. Then he catches wind of a Long Island, N.Y. stock company, J.T. Marlin, that can make anyone into a millionaire as long as they have to drive to work their butts off. Seth sees this as an attempt to please his father whom he never seems to please. 
Enter J.T. Marlin where the leader of the pack (Ben Affleck) convinces these new recruits that they can become millionaires and fulfill all their dreams as long as they make money for their firm. It is about persistence to make the sale on stock options ("Anyone who tells you that money is the root of all evil doesn't have it.") The Affleck character and the scene itself is a direct hark back to Alec Baldwin's powerful cameo in "Glengarry Glen Ross" where he tried to persuade the fellow salesmen to sell like if it was dependent on their lives. Only Affleck seems to come up short in the delivery, if only because Baldwin did it better. 
Seth is intrigued by this firm and the prospect of becoming rich, and thus becomes a full-fledged professional stock broker. He becomes so damn good that he no longer needs his resentful boss, Greg (Nicky Katt). Seth also becomes involved with Greg's former flame, Abby (Nia Long), a beautiful secretary who makes $80,000 a year and supports her sick mother. Naturally, after all the success and wealth, things start to go downhill. Seth realizes he may be immersed in a fake firm, a "boiler room" or brokerage chop shop, that sells stock options on nonexistent companies. How will his dad feel about this? 
"Boiler Room" is "Wall Street" with a dash of "Glengarry Glen Ross" thrown into the mix and it has a great cast of up and coming actors, including Ribisi's sad-eyed, clownish-looking Seth and Vin Diesel's hoarse-voiced Chris, one of the big moneymakers for the firm. I think the film tries a little too hard to seem hip, and the references to the aforementioned films by Oliver Stone and David Mamet respectively clue us into how mediocre and cliched the whole franchise is. Every moment can be predicted with precision, and we know Seth will eventually realize his mistakes and seek forgiveness from his dad. Some of these very scenes are extremely well-written, particularly those involving Seth's father (Ron Rifkin - one of my favorite character actors), a judge who doesn't want his career tarnished by his son's foolhardy schemes. Rifkin has a great line: "Relationship? What relationship? Relationships are your mother's shtick. I am your father." 
If "Boiler Room" dealt with Seth's complex relationship with his father and his own inner struggle between deception and truth, we might have had a real winner here. As it is, the film is bogged down with far too many plotholes, including Seth's relationship with Abby that becomes fraught with complications involving the FBI. And there are later scenes between Seth and his father and another potential scheme that stretch credibility. I will say that "Boiler Room" is very entertaining and informative in its first hour, but it is the anticlimactic finish that makes the whole affair seem like a near-miss. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me for any questions, concerns or general complaints you might have at Faust667@aol.com or at jerry@movieluver.com 

Author
Jamey Hughton
Starring-Giovanni Ribisi, Vin Diesel, Nia Long,
Nicky Katt, Ron Rifkin, Jamie Kennedy and Ben Affleck
Director-Ben Younger
Canadian Rating-14A
Harry (Taylor Nichols), a dedicated family man about to invest in a new
house, gets a call from a feisty stock broker one day. The broker, a new
recruit at local firm J.T. Marlin, is 19-year old college dropout Seth
Davis (Giovanni Ribisi). Seth is urging Harry to invest in a
pharmaceutical drug designed to help premature babies develop, insisting
that it will be approved within 3-months, whereupon the stock will
skyrocket. Harry, who has a relatively well-paying job in the food
business, is wary of investing on Wall Street for obvious reasons. But
Seth is a skilled graduate of Marlin's strict `back-'em-into-a-corner,
never-take-no-for-an-answer' policy of illegitimate money-making. This
environment sets the stage for `Boiler Room', an engrossing tale of
young potential millionaires who spend more time on the telephone than
your 17-year old daughter.
Seth was not always a successful junior stock broker. After pushing
aside the notion of a college degree after only one year, he is
approached by a few past acquaintances (arriving in a luxurious
Ferrari). As of now, Seth is running an illegal gambling convention out
of his own living room - with personalized chips and all. This is an
entrepreneurship that his father (Ron Rifkin), a respected judge, does
not approve of. With dreams of once getting his own Ferrari, Seth is
suckered into the business of stock brokerage. A lesser-known firm
called J.T. Marlin is searching for hot young prospects that could
evolve into junior brokers....and perhaps even further. Scenes in which
Seth is lectured on proper brokerage methods are fascinating. He is
taught to abide by the ABC rule stated in `Glengarry Glen Ross'(Always
Be Closing'), and to always be poised and ready to reel in a `whale'
(aka someone who puts complete trust in their broker and is willing to
shell out cash at their disposal). Seth grows to enjoy the job, and
makes some new friends at the office, including Chris (Vin Diesel), a
hot-shot senior broker with a very persuasive manner.
Like a junior `Wall Street', this film offers a full package of sharp,
cunning dialogue and a continually flowing plotline of absorbing
high-stakes business. But it's the human stories that make `Boiler Room'
so compelling. Seth's rough relationship with his father is rigid and
believable, as is the painful downfall of poor Harry, the first-time
client who could have made the worst financial move of his career. Above
all, `Boiler Room' is an explosive catwalk for an incredible group of
hot young stars to strut their acting abilities. Ribisi (the comic
relief in `The Mod Squad') is in top form, although the character of
Seth has its inconsistencies. Nia Long is excellent as a secretary (and
possible romantic interest) at J.T. Marlin, and Ron Rifkin (`L.A.
Confidential') adds a veteran sense of balance to his scenes. It's also
nice to see Jamie Kennedy (the beloved Randy in the `Scream' films) as a
fellow stock broker, even if the character is a drug-addicted weenie.
But the name you'll be hearing most about this week is Vin Diesel. Along
with an impressive, villainous turn in the monster movie `Pitch Black',
Diesel can now chalk up two robust screen performances in one week. Who
is this guy, you ask? Before February 2000, Diesel was hardly making a
whisper in Hollywood - he had appeared as one of the grunts in `Saving
Private Ryan' and supplied the voice of `The Iron Giant' himself.... but
that's it. Now, it appears as if Diesel is strapped in for a trip toward
stardom. The actor certainly has the agile charisma (and the imposing
physique) to do so. Although Diesel is thoroughly galvanizing, the most
electrifying 10 minutes belong to Ben Affleck, who raises the roof as a
motivational speaker who offers advice to a room full of new recruits.
The level of excitement and intensity reached in `Boiler Room' has not
been matched by another film in 2000. Debut director Ben Younger's
script is full of limber dialogue exchanges, and the momentum simply
sweeps you off your feet. There are a few big cons, as well. The rap
soundtrack gets annoying, and the ending is a bit anticlimactic and
dissatisfying, as Younger opts to leave a few questions somewhat
unanswered. But it's still one brisk, funny sequence after another. In
one priceless example, Seth is called at home by an individual trying to
sell a subscription to a local paper. Disgusted with his approach, Seth
lectures the caller on the proper way to propose a sales pitch to the
potential buyer. I'm no good at sales pitches, but I will say this: go
see `Boiler Room'. It just makes good business sense.
Your Comments Appreciated! movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
Lars Lindahl
Starring Giovanni Ribisi, Nia Long, Vin Diesel , Nicky Katt, Scott Caan, Jamie
Kennedy, Ron Rifkin, and Ben Affleck.         
While watching Boiler Room, I was constantly reminded of last year's
masterpiece Fight Club. Both films consist of a predominately male cast. Both
films follow young men as they illicitly fight the traditional system for their
own desires. And both films are seen through the eyes of one narrator, who
eventually realizes that these men have to be stopped. While Boiler Room
writer/director Ben Younger does not get his point across as well as David
Fincher does for Fight Club, he does contribute another impressive work to a
series of films aiming to represent the new generation. A generation which has
seen the internet prosper and where everyone wants to be a millionaire. Paying
homage to Oliver Stone's 1987 classic Wall Street, Younger is almost
modernizing the tale by using younger, hipper actors to play the greedy
villains as opposed to the older, more experienced types. As is true in real
life, younger minds are becoming richer and richer from their knowledge of more
standard technology. Boiler Room dismisses the notion of ingenuity and shows
that greed and desire for power come in all ages. 
Another similarity with Fight Club is that both films are not action flicks.
Some people are convinced that an all-male cast automatically means there must
be gory violence, here is proof that this is not true. If you want to see an
action movie starring Ben Affleck, go see Reindeer Games this weekend. If you
want to see a smart, insightful film with excellent acting and a clever script,
see Boiler Room. 
Giovanni Ribisi gives an outstanding performance as the film's narrator, Seth.
After dropping out of college and running a lucrative gambling center for
college students in his apartment, Seth is offered a high paying job by a
wealthy man (Nicky Katt). He agrees to take the job (in which you are
guaranteed to become a millionaire within three years) of selling stock to
well-off Americans from the mid-west over the telephone and begins to fit in
quite well with his co-workers. Learning tricky techniques to deceive innocent
people into buying shares of a good in production, Seth figures this is too
good to be true. After stumbling into a room at the wrong time, he knows there
is something no good about this company. At this point, Seth is left with the
ultimate choice; continue with the American dream and make millions or tell the
authorities that something fishy is going on.
Ribisi is believable as Seth especially when he shares scenes with Ron Rifkin,
playing Seth's dad. The two have perfect chemistry as a troubled father and son
trying to impress each other and simultaneously impress themselves. The
transitions from anger to sympathy that these scenes contain are the standout
segments of the entire film. The supporting cast of greedy co-workers is also
flawless. Ben Affleck shines in a short but sweet performance as a recruiter
for the company, Nicky Katt is fabulous as the ostensibly friendly boss who
eventually becomes extremely jealous of Seth, and Vin Diesel gives his best
performance of his career as the foil character of Nicky Katt. The energy of
the cast as a whole makes Boiler Room well paced and never boring.  
The only major error in the film is that nothing major happens. There is no big
plot twist or climatic point to make the film more memorable. Due to the lack
of a major event, Boiler Room never finds a suitable genre to fit into. The
movie is not intense enough to be a thriller, the romantic segments involving
Seth and Abby (Nia Long) are not properly finalized, and the dialogue isn't
funny enough to make it a comedy. In having trouble to characterize the movie
as a whole, Boiler Room is slightly confused at times. It doesn't seem to know
which category to fit itself into. One satisfying concluding scene could have
changed the whole film for the better. Otherwise, the movie is fun to watch
thanks to its lively cast of young actors. 

Author
Dennis Schwartz

BOILER ROOM (director/writer: Ben Younger; cinematographer: Enrique
Chediak; editor: Chris Peppe; cast: Giovanni Ribisi (Seth), Vin Diesel
(Chris), Nia Long (Abby), Nicky Katt (Greg), Scott Caan (Richie), Ron
Rifkin (Seth's Father), Jamie Kennedy (Adam), Taylor Nichols (Harry
Reynard), Bill Sage (Agent Drew), Tom Everett Scott (Michael), Ben
Affleck (Jim Young), 2000)
You get a film with a few subplots in it for the ticket price of one
here. But you ultimately get what you pay for, and here the main story
becomes tiring and the secondary story is Oedipal and underplayed, and
the other subplots are pointless, so what you really get is the main
story being compromised by the subplots, which weakens the main story
into a formula-driven one.
The main story is a homage to the movie "Wall Street" and its message of
greed but, at least, it comes without the moral piety of Oliver Stone.
This business thriller revolves around a 19-year-old college dropout,
Seth (Giovanni), running a successful 24-hour illegal casino out of his
apartment, who switches careers because of pressure from his father, who
is a judge (Rifkin). To please his father, he becomes a stockbroker upon
a chance encounter, when a wealthy bettor, Greg (Nicky Katt), comes into
his casino and offers him a job under his tutelage to make real money.
He takes it, because it seems like a legitimate job and should satisfy
his father's demands for legitimacy, but he still does not give up his
profitable casino.
He goes to work days for this Long Island brokerage firm and quickly
realizes he is again working at something that is dishonest. The firm
sells bogus stocks in companys that may not even exist by using
high-pressure telephone tactics. He realizes that he had a better
product and a more honest business in his casino, where his customers,
at least, had a chance of winning. Yet, he still stays with the firm,
something the film couldn't really show why, even though they tried
explaining it with a subplot of a ruptured father/son relationship.
The blame for him staying at the firm is foisted onto his failed
relationship with his father, instead of holding the kid himself
responsible for making his own hell. The secondary story is about the
family drama, the reactions of his disapproving father, and this part of
the film suffers from being cliché-ridden, as the kid desperately tries
to win approval from his recalcitrant father.
The story's other subplot is a frenetic tale of white men in their
twenties with lots of testosterone to burn, who just want to be
millionaires and don't care how they do it. The dialogue is schmaltzy
and unconvincing; their hard sell techniques are sleazy and leave the
characters soulless, and the 'homeboy' attitudes displayed by their
after-work hijinks- of pub crawling, looking for fights and girls,
leaves a lot to be desired.
The secondary subplot is saved somewhat by Ron Rifkin's understated
performance, that showed the conflict he was having in trying to love
his son, through his pained facial expressions. Father and son had a
tension between them that made for some melodramatic moments.
But this is clearly a film about young people with unbridled energy who
are clueless about how to live their lives without copying someone
else's idea of what the good life is. And because they are so
dull-witted and deliver lines without the gift of gab that a writer like
David Mamet presents his stars with, in his Glengarry Glen Ross, the
film lags in scope. But through the device of quick-paced editing, it
appears to be moving to some sort of rapid resolution. Its moral theme
might be, if you get rich so fast, you must be ready to fall quickly.
The characters here are just low-level white collar hustlers, the amoral
garden variety kind, and their distasteful conduct and empty lives spark
no interest. These are the kind of telemarketers that the American
public has been inundated with over the recent years, with no end in
sight. The best way to handle these fast-talking vultures, is just hang
up on them. Since the film doesn't humanize them, but allows them to be
the monsters they really are, it is indeed a hard sell to find this film
as anything but a look at the ugly side of outlaw capitalism.
This is the writing and directing debut of Ben Younger, a 29-year-old
who seems to know a lot about how unscrupulous brokers operate and wants
desperately to say something about his generation. He has told
interviewers that he was turned down for a similar job by such scam
operators because he couldn't do what they asked him to do.
The movie has a lot of energy and zeroes in on an unhealthy segment of
the population whose lure for working is solely for material things,
such as fancy cars, not giving a hoot how ethical their job is. Its
company name J.T. Marlin, is a play on the legitimate J.P. Morgan,
hoping to fool the suckers who will become their customers into
believing they are of the same repute. The company promises to make
trainees into millionaires within three years, if they follow their
unethical methods. At least in Oliver Stone's film the brokers started
off innocent and turned corrupt, here they start off corrupt and never
for a second see anything wrong about being corrupt until it is too
late, which makes it very difficult to care for anyone in this film, and
even the stiff portrayal of the heartless FBI agents who raid their
firm, evokes no particular feelings for the greedy brokers or, for that
matter, on their greedy victims.
Jim Young (Ben Affleck) -- the firm's trainer of recruits, snarls at
them, "We don't hire brokers here--we train new ones." He flaunts his
wealth at them, his Ferrari, his mansion and, at 27, tells them he is
considered an old-timer here, who had better prove his worth to the firm
every day or else he'll be out. The big boss is also in his twenties,
Michael (Scott), and stays behind the scenes, running the firm as a
complete scam. These young rip-off artists have no class, they do not
even know how to spend their money wisely. In the background hip-hop
music blares away.
This is a film geared for young people, its target audience is probably
made up of those who liked last year's overrated nihilistic Fight Club.
It depicts generation X, struggling to get ahead without knowing how to
act in their attempt at being millionaires or what to do if they reach
their promised land.
A romance is brought into the film as another subplot, but is never
fully developed to be anything but superficial. The one black face in
the firm is a receptionist, Abby (Nia), earning $80,000 a year. She
shuns Greg and goes for his underling Seth, in a romance that has about
as much spark in it as a firecracker that fizzles out in your hand. Why
this interracial romance develops and how it suddenly ends, doesn't
amount to hill or beans. The one tear coming down Abby's cheek when the
romance ran into what was supposedly a roadblock, was about as fake as
the stock deals offered to the Midwestern yokels her firm preys on.
The best thing about the film was the performance of Vin Diesel as
Chris, a seasoned hustler of stocks and bitter rival of Greg's. There is
a certain power in his character, a believability about what he is doing
there that seemed more intense than Seth's fall and redemption. Diesel
remains true to his character, as a cynical, hard-nosed trader, who can
bend if he has to. The film would have been better off focusing in on
his story; it would have remained true to its cynical premise about the
youth it features.
This story is at best, about a theme that was done before in films such
as "Wall Street" and "Tin Men," but this time with even more cynicism
and more of an edge to it. The actual boiler room is the stock firm's
headquarters--  a room crowded with desks, computers, phones and glib
young white guys gloating when they cheat someone in their telephone
deals. The picture itself is a hustle, trying to sell you something by
pretending it has something to say, if you hold onto to its premise
without selling it short.
Underneath the closeness of the boys in the boiler room, there are some
underlying problems in their relationships besides the usual ones of
competiveness. Greg, who like Seth, is Jewish, tells the
Italian-American Chris, "Why don't you go back to Little Italy?" and
Chris shoots back, "Why don't you go make me a latke, dreidel boy?"
Interestingly enough, the only one in the firm that Seth trusts is
Chris, and this trust is rewarded in a contrived scene in the end, as
the film tries to dig itself out of the amoral hole it dug for itself.
The operative word in this film is contrived.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Michael Dequina
The title _Boiler_Room_ is not meant to be taken literally, of course,
but this smart tale of greed in the stock trade indeed reaches a
figurative boil.  First-time writer-director Ben Younger sets his film
off like a rocket, propelled by his and his eager cast's energy and
skill.  It's unfortunate that the boiling point is reached prematurely,
but while the film's forceful momentum wanes, it never completely fades
away.
Greed is hardly a fresh topic for a movie, in particular in the Wall
Street arena; most notably in Oliver Stone's _Wall_Street_. 
_Boiler_Room_ cannot help but recall that film, and Younger even cheekily
references it in one amusing scene; he also pays homage to what can be
deemed the film's other "cross" (as in "_Wall_Street_ crossed with..."):
_Glengarry_Glen_Ross_, written for the stage and screen by David Mamet. 
_Glengarry_'s mantra of "always be closing" is used by the young sharks
working for _Boiler_'s J.T. Marlin, a scrappy brokerage firm that
aggressively pushes stock shares on unsuspecting buyers.  Little do these
buyers--and, for that matter, the sellers--know that the shares are in
companies that do not exist.
When the film's main character, hungry "boiler room" (so named for the
pressure cooker atmosphere and cramped space where the brokers work)
up-and-comer Seth Davis (Giovanni Ribisi) discovers that little fact,
_Boiler_Room_ turns into a fairly pedestrian morality play; will he do
the right thing and take the firm down, or will he just stick with it and
the illegally-obtained money that comes along with the ride?  The
film--and Younger--is clearly at their best in the early stages, which
drops the audience, along with Seth, in the thick of the high-stakes
action.  Younger clearly did his homework on the subject, and the
authenticity he brings to the dialogue and the atmosphere makes for
riveting viewing.
When taking a few steps away from the office, Younger runs into some
problems.  Much like how the story's turn is rather humdrum, so is the
central conflict between Seth and his judge father (Ron Rifkin);
ne'er-do-well Seth--who, before hooking up with J.T. Marlin, ran a card
casino out of his apartment--wants nothing more than to win his uptight
father's respect, and this bit of melodrama is  too contrived to
completely work.  Nonetheless, this subplot is kept watchable and
somewhat involving by the performances of Rifkin and especially Ribisi.
Ribisi rebounds nicely from a terrible 1999 (Remember _The_Other_Sister_
and _The_Mod_Squad_?  Hopefully not), providing a likable and magnetic
anchor in the often frenzied goings-on.  Everyone in the cast makes a
lasting impression; standing out in the boiler room are Vin Diesel and
Nicky Katt as more seasoned hotshots, and Ben Affleck is wonderfully oily
in the small role of the firm's head recruiter.  As J.T. Marlin's
receptionist, Abby, the talented--if underused--Nia Long is able to come
off as more than the film's token injection of estrogen and Seth's love
interest.
While the energy of _Boiler_Room_'s story peters out, the actors never
let up, picking up the slack, carrying the film down the home stretch. 
_Boiler_Room_ cannot be called a completely successful debut for Younger,
but it is an indisputable triumph for the young acting talent on board.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CinemaReview Magazine:  http://www.CinemaReview.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
James Sanford
 In the minds of most people, Oliver Stone's 1987 film "Wall Street" is
chiefly remembered today for Michael Douglas' frighteningly funny
performance as a suave but bloodthirsty trader and for having opened
only weeks after the stock market tumble.  However, to some young
people, particularly those who re-read "The Art of War" regularly and
live for sales on Armani suits, the movie is a vital cultural touchstone
full of such pearls of wisdom as "greed is good" and "lunch is for
wimps." Writer-director Ben Younger's "Boiler Room" would love to be the
"Wall Street" of the post-yuppie era, featuring a crew of
twentysomething warriors hot on the trail of their first million and
willing to do just about anything to close a deal or get a promotion.
 Unfortunately, "Boiler Room" doesn't have Douglas or anyone like him at
its wheel. Instead, Younger gives us Ben Affleck as Jim Young, a
no-nonsense pitchman who recruits hungry youngsters into the J.T. Marlin
brokerage with promises of endless cash and luxurious living, then all
but castrates the kids if they underperform. Affleck appears to have the
moxey to pull off the role, but, much to the movie's detriment, he's not
the main character.
 In fact, he's reduced to a glorified cameo role while we're asked to
care about shiftless Seth Davis (Giovanni Ribisi) who gave up running
daily card games out of his living room to enter the trading world after
seeing the Porsches and Ferraris in the J.T. Marlin parking lot. "I was
making good money at the casino," Seth tells us in his narration, "but
these guys were mackin' it hard."
 Sadly, Seth soon learns what J.T. Marlin founder Michael (Tom Everett
Scott) and his disciples are peddling is not but blue-chip stock but
worthless shares in make-believe companies. Didn't he ever stop to
wander why the firm had its offices on Long Island instead of in
Manhattan? Or why so much paper-shredding goes on after office hours?
 Perhaps in an attempt to ape David Mamet's shark-eat-shark drama
"Glengarry Glen Ross," Younger's script is proudly profane and goes out
of its way to make almost all the major characters thoroughly
unpleasant. But Mamet's work had real bite and fire, while "Boiler Room"
is ultimately a troubled-son morality play (with bad Dad as the villain)
dressed up in tough talk and a relentless rap soundtrack.
 As he proved in last year's fiasco "The Mod Squad," Ribisi, with his
blackened eyes and thick tongue, is definitely not hero material and he
looks woefully out of place in the company of Affleck, Vin Diesel and
Scott Caan, all of whom are convincingly slimy and cold-blooded. With
such a cipher at its center, "Boiler Room" wears out its welcome about
as quickly as a telemarketer calling during the dinner hour. James
Sanford

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
At some point in their lives, many adults look back upon their
twenty-or-so years of schooling and wonder where all the knowledge
went; or better yet, what was the point of the knowledge? The
characters in `Boiler Room' figured out early on that their
upper-class prep school upbringing, and the limited amount of
knowledge that came along with it, was all just preparation for
fulfilling life's most important task: becoming a millionaire .
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi), the son of upper-class Jewish parents,
knows that money is nothing without hard work. When we first meet him,
he has dropped out of college and pays the rent by running a casino in
his home. His overbearing father (Ron Rifkin), who happens to be a
prominent judge, disapproves of his son's work.
At this point, fate brings Greg (Nicky Katt) into Seth's
casino. He offers him a job as a stock broker at his small firm
J.T. Martin, where Seth is guaranteed to make a million dollars in his
first three years. Why pass it up, thinks Seth, if I can make money
and please my father at the same time? So he decides to take the job
and learn the ropes of telemarketing.
It only takes a few weeks for Seth to become one of the
firm's high-rollers, along with a group of guys who can quote every
line from Oliver Stone's `Wall Street'. But la dolce vita is
spoiled when Seth finds out that the firm is selling stocks that
don't exist. An intense battle with his supervisor doesn't help
matters much.
First-time writer/director Ben Younger makes `Boiler
Room' into a dark, direct study of day-traders. However, the film
lacks much of the immediacy found in similar films such as
`Glengarry Glen Ross' and `The Firm'. Younger's hip-hop
style is anything but conventional, yet `Boiler Room's'
storyline paints by the numbers.
What makes `Boiler Room' an involving picture are the
brilliantly smug performances from the young ensemble cast. Along with
Ribisi and Katt as the leads, this young group includes Ben Affleck,
Nia Long, Tom Everett Scott, Jamie Kennedy and Vin Diesel. The energy
needed to make this film successful is provided by each of the
aforementioned actors.
`Boiler Room' is certainly an ambitious first project
for Ben Younger, so it's disappointing to note that the film's
elements never quite jell. The first portion of the film is often
comical, while the final statement is largely depressing. Younger has
built `Boiler Room' around one probable assumption. The world is
one big stock market; some sell out, others buy in.

Author
Ron Small
Starring: Giovanni Ribisi, Nicky Katt, Vin Diesel, Nia Long, Ron Rifkin, Ben
Affleck, Scott Caan, Tom Everett Scott, Jamie Kennedy
In 1987 the stock market crashed, and Oliver Stone's WALL STREET was released
to critical acclaim and packed movie houses. WALL STREET lucked out in its
timing; the recent crash gave the film a resonation it might not of had, and
though its kill-or-be-killed approach to business was exaggerated, that very
ideology was keyed into the mind set of the quintessential Reagan-era
businessman. Stone constructed his film as a mythical good vs. evil tale
relayed in the fast-paced milieu of the burgeoning stock exchange. Critics and
audiences lauded WALL STREET, elevating its status to that of a contemporary
classic. I'm proud to say that I will never be counted as one of them. I found
WALL STREET to be just as axiomatic and pandering as the majority of Stone's
output with its thin caricatures, obvious sentiments, and a charisma barren
performance by the young Charlie Sheen. Stone goes for broke in every scene
(the same could be said for nearly all of his works). This approach tends to
bury his purported message beneath a heap of good intentions. He directs stock
exchange scenes in typical hyperbolic mode with people shouting into phones as
if they were in a plummeting airplane. It's all an excuse for Stone to ratchet
up the emotion with false intensity, rather than explore what these situations
are really like. I have a feeling the brokers would be psychologically
manipulative (as they are presented in BOILER ROOM) rather than laughably over
the top. These guys are salesmen after all, not televised judges.
More than anything I am baffled by why so many adore WALL STREET. The only
possible solution I can muster is its release date. And not just the timeliness
of the "Greed is Good" subject matter: The film was plumped down in the
eighties, a decade in which the one-joke comedy rose to an art form, and a
group of glamorous Brat Packers smirked their way through inane high concept,
low result movies. In my mind, the eighties will forever be remembered as a
decade with not only a proliferation of bad movies, but bad music, bad hair,
and bad clothes. Maybe Stone's After School Special set in Wall Street was
viewed as a welcome change of pace.
BOILER ROOM is an equally well-timed film with some similarities to Stone's
piece of crap. They both feature a consequential father-son relationship,
though BOILER ROOM'S is much more subtle and touching. And they are both
concerned with the power of greed, yet the men in BOILER ROOM are akin to
poseurs presuming to be big shots rather than the slippery-smooth, heartless
Gordon Gecko figures of WALL STREET. BOILER ROOM is a message movie as well,
though (at least until the end) doesn't shove it in our faces.
BOILER ROOM is about the pursuit of cash and the degrees to which people will
go for that cash. As I said, this film is indeed timely in a society where WHO
WANTS TO BE A MILLIONAIRE is the number one prime time show every day (bringing
about a revolution of prime time TV watching that hasn't been seen in quite a
while); not only do we want to be millionaires, we want to watch other people
become millionaires! In our super-judgmental, power-oriented culture the desire
for money supersedes everything; when you have money, you have it "all".
And Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) wants it "all" the easy way. He's a well-intentioned
college drop out who gets lured into working for an illegally run brokerage
firm (the kind that sells junk stock) whereupon he meets others just like him.
Ben Affleck is cast as Jim, the company headhunter, who struts in commanding
the room like a frat boy Gordon Gecko. His job is to influence trainee's into
becoming enthusiastic employees by giving a speech that subtly attacks their
man hood. It's ironic that he sells these pups the same load of B.S that
they're told to dish out to prospective buyers. Affleck's character is
obviously supposed to recall Alec Baldwin's similar character in GLENGARY GLEN
ROSS, and that proves detrimental to the actor's performance. Affleck shouts,
curses and be-littles his rookie employees just like Baldwin, minus the edge.
When Alec played the scene he became the part, spewing those brutal lines as if
they were his own. By comparison Affleck simply looks as if he were doing a
really hammy line reading.
The brokers approach their job with the fervor of overzealous jocks: They storm
to work like football players on the way to the big game. Rap music thumps on
the soundtrack effectively illustrating who these guys think they are:
intellectual gangsters. They aren't above a rumble as a test of man hood
especially during leisure time where the lumbering Scott Caan seems all too
eager to use his fists in minor disputes. We drink up this world along with
Seth, and watch him become seduced by it, just like we might be.
As in all cautionary tales, BOILER ROOM begins with seducing us into its
illustrious world of profit and wrongdoing, then smacks us with the
consequences of all the recklessness. I know this story. We all do. But it can
work if it's told with intelligence and energy, and that is how writer\director
Ben Younger tells it. As a director of (please excuse my French) mise-en-scene
Younger has much to learn. His style is sitcom bland. But his writing isn't.
Younger's script is well studied in the vernacular of this bunch; his dialogue
is like a junior David Mamet.
Despite the moderate camera work Younger fills his phone-pitch scenes with
tension that comes from just the performances and the tightly wound script. The
brokers\hucksters counter every customer objection, gently bullying them into
buying stock. These moments are filmed like psychological action scenes: a
tense confrontation between a victimizer and a victim who isn't aware that he
is one.
With the exception of Affleck's brief appearances, the performances are truly
exceptional. Ribisi, who has the edgy looks of a character actor, is extremely
potent here, working his pale angular face, and eerie, plaintive stare for all
their worth. He conveys child-like vulnerability (his character seems to hide
in a corner whenever things aren't going his way) in some scenes, and in others
he's ferociously cut throat. The Jekyll and Hyde contradiction works well in
the movie: Ribisi is confident when it's just him and the phone, but cowardly
in front of authority figures including his abrasive father (authoritatively
played by Ron Rifkin).
BOILER ROOM thankfully avoids WALL STREET-like histrionics in the sales-pitch
sequences; the sales build slowly like a crescendo of intelligent psychological
ploys. Those ploys are taught to Seth by Chris (Vin Diesel), a kind broker who
alternates between Seth's friend and his mentor. Diesl shines in his minor
role. This week I saw the sci-fi opus PITCH BLACK in which Diesel plays a
completely different role in an equally effective manner. In that film he has
the kind of role that might have gone to Arnold Schwarzenegger in the 80's, and
in BOILER ROOM he has the kind of role that might have gone to Elliot Gould in
the 70's. Nicky Katt is also memorable as a superior broker obsessed with what
he can't have.
Nia Long, as the firm's secretary, (a lone black women amongst many white men)
is Ribisi's love interest in a part that at first looks to be as insignificant
as most of the parts this talented actress gets, but develops into something
more interesting. The two make an oddly likeable couple. Long is smart and
brash, and Ribisi is charmingly aloof. At one point he says to her "I'm just
lookin' for some chocolate love". It's a terrible line but Ribisi delivers it
in such an innocuous child-like way, it becomes sweetly endearing.
Unfortunately, towards the end, the BOILER ROOM turns a tad schmaltzy. There is
much crying, hugging, and sorrowful stares. This is okay when taken in small
doses, but Younger's conclusion is constructed as a series of these boo-hoo
moments, one following the other. A particular misstep is his attempt to show
the effect that Seth's manipulations have on one of his poor victims. It's not
a bad idea but the execution is lacking, with those scenes feeling tacked on to
further spell out the message. That message being, "Greed is Bad". Yes it's
patently obvious, but BOILER ROOM conveys it by introducing us to a culture
that I haven't seen much of in the movies: The disenfranchised twenty something
entrepreneur. And all WALL STREET did was introduce us to a simplistic fantasy
world of saints and sinners. BOILER ROOM offers neither extreme. It gives us
what is in between, and for that I am thankful.
 http://www.geocities.com/incongruity98   Reeling  (Ron Small)

Author
Chuck Schwartz
Cranky CriticŽ movie reviews: Boiler Room
Rated  [R], 120 minutes
Starring Giovanni Ribisi, Ben Affleck, Nia Long, Vin Diesel
Written and Directed by Ben Younger
website: www.boilermovie.com
IN SHORT: Both a gripping story and an assault on all senses.
At a time when every over the hill teevee celebrity is giving away
millions of dollars in the new glut of prime time game shows filling our
small screens, it is somehow appropriate that we once again get a big
screen flick about the rise and fall of folk to whom the phrase "Greed
is Good" is the watchword of the only faith they worship, the Almighty
Buck.
Boiler Room, written and directed by first time-er Ben Younger, plainly
sets its sights on predecessors like Wall Street and Glen Garry Glen
Ross, and it meets its target. Even the usually annoying presence of
nonstop rap as the soundtrack music for the first half hour of the film
didn't bother me (But I digress...)
Out near the campus of Queens College, Seth Davis (Giovanni Ribisi) is
running a brisk, though illegal, business; a 24 hour a day backroom
casino for the kidlets of the campus. A college dropout himself, Seth's
occupation puts him in direct conflict with his father Marty(Ron Rifkin)
which brings up one of those father-son-mother in the middle subplots
that Cranky laps up with a spoon. Into the casino one day comes Greg
Feinstein (Nicky Katt), flashing an incredible roll of bills and a
yellow Ferrari parked in the street outside. Knowing that dad wants him
out of the illegal world of gambling, Seth bolts to the more white
collar world of the stock market.
In retrospect, Seth will liken his work to that of ghettoboys dealing to
the habits of crack whores. In this case, he is selling greed -- the
promise of riches in unknown penny stocks sold via the telephone to a
cold list of unsuspecting suckers. We follow Seth along the path to
ruin, guided by professional hard sellers, with egos the size of Montana
(and many with fists to match). It's only a bit part but Ben Affleck
burns onscreen as the recruiter for a firm called J.T. Marlin, owned by
an equally mysterious slickster named Michael Brantley (Tom Everett
Scott). The battle in the pits, where Seth rises to the top of the new
recruits, is best defined by the vicious rivalry between Greg (who found
Seth) and another senior broker, Chris Varick (Vin Diesel) who has
trained the kidlet.
Seth is taught how to dress, how to pitch, how to manipulate and lie,
how to close a sale. In short, he learns how to take the rubes for every
penny they've stashed in their retirement funds. It is a world in which
a man with no moral center can make an insane amount of money, and still
be young enough to live with their parents. So... what happens when a
man who has had all notions of ethics drummed out of him gets some? I'll
leave it at that.
Boiler Room is an electrifying assault on your senses, with performances
that scream from the screen (Ribisi, Diesel and Affleck particularly)
and a pace that doesn't let up. The necessary scenes detailing the
results of Seth's calls initially feel out of place but, as I said,
they're necessary. This is a world where testosterone is sprinkled on
the breakfast cereal at the start of the day and rivalries in the pit
extend to who will nail the lovely receptionist (Nia Long) outside the
locked doors.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to Boiler Room, he would have paid...
Boiler Room is macho to the max. The rating may prove to be a half a
buck or so high, six months from now, but you haven't suffered through
the crap that I've suffered through this past six weeks. Boiler Room was
a welcome breeze despite an incredibly offensive rap over the
end-titles. (Cranky wonders if this is what his grandparents felt about
rock and roll. But that's just me.)
The Cranky CriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š 2000
by, Chuck Schwartz. All Rights Reserved. Cranky on the web at
www.crankycritic.com

Author
Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by Entertainment Distribution on May 5, 2000; certificate 
15; 119 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Ben Younger; produced by Jennifer Todd, Suzanne Todd.
Written by Ben Younger.
Photographed by Enrique Chediak; edited by Chris Peppe.
It's only two weeks since I reviewed "American Psycho", but here already is a 
more powerful movie dealing with similar themes, without the dumb gags or 
vicious streak. "Boiler Room" is often a comedy, because it lets us spend 
time with some of the most risible people alive -- stockbrokers. It's also a 
very serious thriller, because the protagonist gets seduced by their 
money-grubbing lifestyle and ends up in over his head.
His name is Seth (Giovanni Ribisi), a 19-year old New Yorker who dropped out 
of college and supports himself by running an illegal casino out of his 
apartment. When his father, a federal court judge, discovers this, he hits 
the roof, and tells him to get a proper job. Seth can't handle dad's disgust. 
He determines to find an occupation that requires him to wear a suit.
Then one of his friends sets him up at the firm of J.T. Marlin -- a 
telemarketing 'chop shop' that sells people stock for companies that don't 
exist, then charges them huge commission rates to dump it on the open market. 
This is more dishonest than the casino, but hey, it looks respectable enough. 
And it pays better. That's made clear in a pep talk by the recruiter, Jim 
(Ben Affleck), who seems to have used Alec Baldwin's chilling monologue in 
"Glengarry Glen Ross" as a self-help tape. "Work here," he tells the men in 
front of him, "And within three years you'll be a millionaire. Anybody who 
says money is the root of all evil doesn't have any."
The guys know Oliver Stone's "Wall Street" off by heart, too. They proudly 
recite the villain's speeches; oblivious to the message, and getting a kick 
out of the lingo. When they're all on the phone, screaming stock pitches to 
potential victims, the obsession and aggression in the office is palpable, 
and so very evil and illegal that we know something disastrous is bound to 
happen.
Since we are so engaged by Seth, we watch this with more tension than 
disgust. He is a well-written hero for the piece because he's an essentially 
good kid; we can sympathise with his desire to make money, and though he does 
dishonest things, he doesn't realise it, because he hasn't evaluated the 
situation in that way. The climate in J.T. Marlin teaches him to consider 
only money, and if there's nothing wrong with the pay check, what could be 
wrong at all? Seth has to be suckered in before he can realise what a sham 
this is, and "Boiler Room" is fascinating because it lets us see the whole 
process unfold. 
All of the movie's dialogue is impressive. Brokers' conversations sound like 
a cross between financial jargon and military planning. And Seth's scenes 
with his father (Ron Rifkin) and the film's love interest (Nia Long) are 
staged like clichés but played with humour, emotion, presence and 
personality. The characters talk about their backgrounds, hopes and needs in 
convincing ways. "Boiler Room" works as a morality play by presenting us with 
people whose moral compasses it's actually possible to care about.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Author
Steve Rhodes
Writer/director Ben Younger's BOILER ROOM is ANIMAL HOUSE MEETS WALL
STREET, as a bunch of guys in their early twenties get rich quick
peddling worthless stock.
Acting like loud-mouthed frat boys, these guys work the phones cold
calling other guys to offer them deals that, correctly, sound too good
to be true.  With intense pressure, these supersalesmen bilk families
out of their last nickel.  The brokerage firm's recruiter and drill
sergeant (Ben Affleck) lectures the new grunts by barking at them,
"People come to work for this firm for one reason only -- to get filthy
rich.  That's it."  And if you not willing to lie and cajole every
second, you're not cut out for their firm.
Succumbing to this instant millionaire mentality, Seth Davis (Giovanni
Ribisi), gives up a lucrative job running an illegal blackjack game out
of his apartment.  Ribisi (THE OTHER SISTER) is the movie's weakest link
as he never convincing transforms from wimp to supersalesmen.  In his
one emotional scene towards the end, his acting comes across as awkward
and staged.  But the film's bright script and crisp pacing more than
compensate for this weakness in the casting.
A subplot involves Seth's strained relationship with his shrill father,
Marty (Ron Rifkin), a judge who wants his son to get a respectable job,
such as a broker.  "I'm not your best friend, that's your mother's
racket," he lectures him sternly.  "I'm not your girlfriend, I'm your
father," Marty tells his son when he comes just wanting to talk.  "Clean
up your life, then we can talk."
The guys at Seth's firm, including Chris (Vin Diesel), Michael (Tom
Everett Scott) and Marc (David Younger), make more money than they know
what to do with, so they blow it as fast as they can on cars, booze,
women, drugs, gadgets and houses.  But they don't appear to enjoy it
much.  What turns them on is the act of making the money, not the
spending of it.
Nia Long (THE BEST MAN) does a nice turn as the firm's very well
compensated receptionist.  She is a realist who counsels Seth to own up
to what he does.  "You're got to admit to yourself it's not charity work
and enjoy it or get out," she advises him.
The ending is wrapped up too neatly and conventionally, but, up until
then, the movie takes you on an exhilarating ride.  The spirit of the
film is best encapsulated in the only extracurricular activity that the
guys really seem to enjoy.  Like Trekkies, who watch the series so often
that they can repeat all of the lines, these supercharged brokers love
to gather for a ritualistic viewing of Michael Douglas in WALL STREET.
They bark out the lines like cheerleaders at a football game.  They
worship their hero, Gordon Gekko, like a god.
BOILER ROOM runs 1:55.  It is rated R for language, drug usage and some
violence.  The film would be acceptable for older teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Dustin Putnam
Directed by Ben Younger.
Cast: Giovanni Ribisi, Vin Diesel, Nia Long, Nicky Katt, Ron Rifkin, Ben 
Affleck, Scott Caan, Jamie Kennedy, Tom Everett Scott, Taylor Nichols, Bill 
Sage.
2000 - 119 minutes
Rated R (for profanity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, February 20, 2000.
29-year-old director Ben Younger's "Boiler Room" has already been heavily 
touted as an all-twentysomething version of 1987's "Wall Street," and even 
1992's "Glengary Glen Ross." A morality tale about greed, corruption, and 
heartless dishonesty within a crooked stockbroking firm located way out on 
Long Island, our 19-year-old college drop-out protagonist, Seth Davis 
(Giovanni Ribisi), is not exactly what you would call an angel, either. 
Holding an illegal amateur casino outside of his home's basement in Queens, 
Seth is rolling in the dough and enjoying every second of it, until one night 
he meets gambler Greg (Nicky Katt), who makes him realize he can't waste his 
whole life doing this. 
Before long, Seth has joined Greg and a slew of other thriving young men at 
the high-pressured, cutthroat brokerage firm of J.T. Marlin. Promised by the 
firm's 27-year-old head recruiter, Jim Young (Ben Affleck), to be making a 
million dollars within the initial three years of working there, Seth begins 
to get his first real taste of the outside adult world, and starts hanging 
out with some of his coworkers, including the understanding Chris (Vin 
Diesel) and hot-tempered Richie (Scott Caan). Out of all of his new friends, 
some of which he obviously doesn't fit in with, Seth is able to open up the 
most with Abby (Nia Long), the African-American receptionist who has decided 
to stay at the all-white firm because of her own generous paychecks, which 
help her to take care of her ill mother. It doesn't take too much time for 
Seth to realize that the employees of J.T. Marlin are fraudulent stockbrokers 
who knowingly are taking the money of innocent, potential clients, and the 
worse thing is, Seth discovers he is turning out just like them.
Littered with a soundtrack of rap music in a motion picture made up almost 
entirely of white males, but which adds an unexpected edge to certain 
memorable moments, "Boiler Room" is a drama about a group of people who are 
rotten to the core, without any qualms about being deceitful and uncaring, 
just as long as they are making some quick bucks; and a few select souls who 
are the conscious of the film--people who may also do things wrong within the 
course of the picture, but who are able to at least recognize their mistakes. 
Equipped with a superfluous editing style that would be more at home on MTV 
or in a relatively innocent comedy like 1999's "Detroit Rock City," sticks 
out like a sore thumb here. With flashy jump-cuts and shots that purposefully 
match the music, editor Chris Peppe does his job professionally but it was 
unwise for director Younger to decide on such a distracting approach.
"Boiler Room" takes place in a savagely cold environment, but the film is not 
without its dramatic character moments for Seth, particularly in the scenes 
with his unflaggingly disapproving and stern father (Ron Rifkin). Oddly, 
then, one of the film's major pitfalls is its resolutely sterile emotions. 
Even when we are supposed to invest our interest in Seth, as well as his 
relationships with his father and Abby, the whole movie has a strangely 
detached feeling to it, and while a few of the performances are top-notch 
(okay, only Ben Affleck's cockily assured multimillionaire has the ability to 
grab you by the throat every time he appears), the rest of the cast and 
writer-director Younger never seem to fully have their hearts in the material.
As the undoubted central character of Seth, Giovanni Ribisi is an offbeat 
performer without the Hollywood-style good looks or leading-man potential, 
but who does his job respectably. Best in his less demanding moments, Ribisi 
ultimately does not, however, pull off the emotional breakdown sequence with 
his father, which feels like it's right out of Acting 101. The fresh 
appearance of Nia Long, as Abby, is appreciated, but she is generally 
underutilized, and the romantic subplot that is sparked between Seth and she 
has not an ounce of chemistry or passion, nor is it even necessary or come 
with a satisfying payoff.
But the disappointing wrap-up of their relationship is apparently only in 
staying with the rest of the film. "Boiler Room" had enough of my rooting 
attention to get a marginal pass from me throughout its running time, but the 
finale, to put it mildly, is a bust. Setting itself up for so very much more 
than actually is present, not only is the character arc of Seth predictable, 
but the way all of the elements around him are dealt with is an unconvincing 
cop-out, leaving you in the theater commenting to yourself: "I just dedicated 
two hours of my life to a movie that led up to that?" Filmmaker Ben Younger 
set out to make a thought-provoking rumination on the power of money and the 
people it affects, but all he really has done is made a motion picture that, 
for all of its potential, never breaks away from being merely skin-deep.

Author
John Beachem
"They say money can't buy happiness? Just look at the smile on my face," Jim
Young (Ben Affleck) tells his new employees in one of the best scenes of
"Boiler Room", the new film from first time writer/director, Ben Younger.
For those of you who are wondering, the film's title refers to the
underbelly of wall street. Boiler rooms are the locations of all sorts of
illegal activity, involving stock brokers ripping off naive customers for
all they're worth. The film itself may start on shaky legs, but once it gets
going, this is a thoroughly enjoyable movie which does an excellent job
showing us how the lust for money can corrupt us all.
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) is a young entrepreneur who makes his living running
an illegal casino out of his house. His father (Ron Rifkin), a respected
judge, is not at all pleased about this, particularly when he finds out that
his son has left college to pursue this "career". One day Seth's friend,
Adam (Jamie Kennedy), stops by with another man named Greg (Nicky Katt), who
turns out to be a broker for a small firm called J.T. Marlin, where he has
amassed quite a fortune. Greg and Adam soon convince Seth to give the firm a
try. Soon, Seth becomes a rising star in the company, begins dating the
receptionist, Abby (Nia Long), and even makes some semblance of peace with
his father. However, not everything is what it appears to be at J.T. Marlin.
Late night paper shreddings occur, supposedly great stock options don't
appear to exist, and the owners seem to be keeping escape plans in case the
newspapers start asking questions.
One of the things that most surprised me about this film was that Younger
managed to turn what should have been a boring subject into a film which
sometimes reminded me of the brilliance of "Wall Street". Like I said,
"Boiler Room" starts off poorly, with a somewhat boring intro, out of place
rap music, and distracting camera cuts. However, once Seth gets fully
involved with J.T. Marlin, things certainly pick up. The actual trading
scenes are very well done, and perfectly convey the frenzy of the constant
escalating situations. The scenes showing the activities of these men
outside of work are superbly constructed as well. For example, in one scene
the group hangs out at Jim Young's house, watching "Wall Street" itself
while quoting the entire film, word for word.
As for the acting, Giovanni Ribisi ("Saving Private Ryan") is somewhat
miscast. While he does a good job playing a young man who is weak in the
face of his father, it's difficult to believe that he turns into a cutthroat
wall street broker. There's also something cold about his acting during the
more emotional scenes. Nia Long ("The Best Man") is fairly good as Seth's
love interest who is struggling with her conscience, and Ron Rifkin ("LA
Confidential") is quite good as the father who says things like
"Relationship? What relationship? I'm your father, not your girlfriend." Of
the main cast, the two best actors are Nicky Katt ("The Limey"), who is
quite creepy as the twisted Greg, and Van Diesel ("Pitch Black") as Chris,
who is Seth's friend and the only other broker who seems to be a decent
person. Amazingly, the real standout performance here comes from Ben
Affleck. While Affleck appears in only three or four scenes, two of them
involve him giving amazingly stirring speeches with a talent I didn't
believe he possessed.
The only other fault I can think of is the film's ending. While Hollywood
writers may not have run out of original ideas afterall, they've certainly
forgotten how to end a film. "Boiler Room" is yet another one of those
films, like "Eye of the Beholder", which simply stops rather than ending.
We're left with dozens of unanswered questions and the feeling that Younger
simply ran out of ideas. "Boiler Room" runs a bit too long at two hours, and
I personally would have cut out the first fifteen minutes or so. I'd
recommend it to fans of the film, "Wall Street", and to anyone who has even
a passing interest in the stock market. I give it a well earned three and a
half out of five stars.
Comments? Feel free to e-mail them to: johnbeachem@dependentfilms.net
For past reviews, movie news, and other fun stuff, visit:
http://www.dependentfilms.net
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad, see it only if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever made. See it only if you enjoy pain.

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
Welcome to J.T. Marlin, a Long Island stock brokerage that guarantees
recruits that they will become millionaires within three years.
Although J.T. Marlin is over an hour away from the hustle and bustle of
Wall Street, their parking lot is full of expensive, new cars, driven by
employees in expensive, new suits.  The senior executives are
twenty-seven and they know Wall Street by heart.
The allure of the job is certainly understandable  get rich and bond
with guys that are just like you.  But for Seth Davis (Giovanni Ribisi,
The Other Sister), it's also a chance to finally gain the one thing he's
never had:  His father's respect.  All he needs to do is work his ass
off and follow J.T. Marlin's few rules.  The first is `ABC,' or `Always
Be Closing,' an acronym lifted from David Mamet's amazing Glengarry Glen
Ross, a similar film with similar subject matter.
Instead of Alec Baldwin spouting these mottos, Boiler Room uses Ben
Affleck (Dogma) as its pitchman.  He plays Jim Young, a senior manager
at the firm in charge of firing up the new recruits (done here in three
hysterical scenes).  In addition to `ABC,' Jim also teaches the trainees
not to `Pitch the Bitch' (sell to women) and to always `Act As If'
(insert whatever phrase you'd please  like `You Own the Company').
Of course, the one rule that the recruits don't learn is that if it
seems to good to be true, it usually is.  J.T. Marlin sells worthless
stock in phony businesses to whomever they can get on the phone.  Their
tactics are aggressive, manipulative and illegal, but everyone is so
busy counting the piles of money that nobody seems to care that they're
bilking honest people out of their life savings.
Also serving as the film's narrator, we learn that Seth is different.
He doesn't care about the money  his parents are loaded, his dad (Ron
Rifkin, The Negotiator) a federal judge.  A college dropout that ran a
highly profitable casino out of his Queens apartment, Seth takes the job
on the advice of childhood friend and J.T. Marlin manager Greg Weinstein
(Nicky Katt, The Limey), seeing the new profession as a way to get back
in his father's good graces.  He spends three months as a trainee,
passes the Section 7 exam and becomes one of the firm's better
salesmen.  But Seth knows a good scam when he sees one and wisely
proceeds with caution.
Boiler Room is a very impressive film debut from Ben Younger, who wrote
and directed the film after spending over a year interviewing real-life
brokers.  In a world where it seems everyone is a day-trader and
Microsoft secretaries make as much money as professional athletes, the
subject matter is hip and topical.  He shows the men of Generation X as
power-hungry deviants that will do anything to get ahead in life,
including ridiculing others for their race, creed, color and sexual
preference.  They mix in brokerage lingo with their insults, but
Younger's script deftly explains the entire process from cold sales call
to closing.
The film also looks amazingly accomplished for a first-timer.  Younger,
cinematographer Enrique Chediak (The Faculty) and editor Chris Peppe
(Suicide Kings) do a great job at capturing both the look of the giant,
action-packed sales floor of J.T. Marlin, as well as the genuinely
gut-wrenching emotion portrayed by Ribisi.  The acting is great, and its
hip-hop heavy score was produced by The Angel.  The only complaint is
the presence of the tiresome romantic subplot involving a black
secretary (played by Nia Long, The Best Man), which seems thrown in just
to offset the objectionable racial material in the film.
1:55  R for adult language, some sexual content and violence

Author
Mac VerStandig
---A copy of this review can be found at
http://www.moviereviews.org/boiler_room.htm ---
Boiler Room, the first hardcore stock exchange film since 1988's Wall
Street, is one of the most spellbinding thrillers in recent years. Two hours
haven't moved so quickly since America was transfixed on a white Ford
Bronco, the Los Angeles Freeway and a national hero with a gun to his head.
(Speaking of which, why hasn't anyone bought the movie rights? Allison
Janney would be the perfect Marcia Clark!)
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) has dropped out of college and started a casino in
his New York apartment complete with specialized house chips, porno
magazines and foul language. He no longer needs a student loan check to make
rent; portraits of Benjamin Franklin accumulate via this underground
business. Seth's father (Ron Rifkin who is a dead ringer for Ed Harris 10
years down the road), a respected Judge, isn't totally blind to his son's
doings and ultimately confronts him, sending an already rocky father-son
relationship into pure turmoil.
Seth decides that the New York Stock Exchange, in essence the world's
largest "legal" casino, is the place for him and takes a job at J. T.
Marlin, a brokerage just outside of town- trying to impress  his father. The
firm is full of 20-something millionaires, over-stuffed rolodexes, expensive
suits, fine Italian-leather chairs and sheer decadence. The money is so easy
to make because the stocks being pitched don't exist. Yes, J. T. Marlin is a
stock chop-shop, and like all fascinating scams, the FBI has its eyes
fixated on this one and, more importantly, our protagonist.
The workaholic society portrayed is not unlike many modern-day war room
businesses; Steve Jobs' and Bill Gates' empires closely resemble J. T.
Marlin in their dedication to working more hours than exist in a normal day.
In the beginning of the film, when you suspect little more than hard work
and dedication has led to the abundance of wealth, you want to somehow enter
the silver screen and become part of the culture. After all, Marlin's
workers are guaranteed their first million within three years, the secretary
makes $80,000 and last month's phone bill was a tad under the nonchalant
$400,000 mark. But as things progress and you learn more and more about the
poor folks who lose their money in the massive scam, a middle-class man
named Harry Reynard (Taylor Nichols) in particular, you become more and more
comfy in your seat and appreciate the distance between yourself and the
screen.
The initially sexy appeal of J. T. Marlin is helped by Jim Young (Ben
Affleck)'s pitch to new recruits. The so-called "group interview" is little
more than his ruthless sales tactics at their best with the aid of several
f-words and the re-assuring tagline "We don't hire brokers here. We train
new ones." But future mottos prove less appealing, like a "don't pitch the
bitch" anti-woman philosophy. Ultimately, when all rosy images are brushed
away and Seth reflects on his casino, the truth is more evident than ever,
"the illegal business I was running was the most legitimate thing I had
going."

Author
Jeff Bogart

Boiler Room, starring Giovanni Ribisi, Tom Everett Scott, Ben Affleck, Vin
Diesel, Nia Long, Nicky Katt, Scott Caan, Ron Rifkin and Jamie Kennedy. Rated R
for language and mild violence. Directed by Ben Younger. 2000.
   Most will agree that Boiler Room is an obvious combination of Wall Street
and Glengarry GlenRoss.  The film even mentions the two on several occasions. 
And while the obvious is that this isn't as equally good as the other two
(especially the latter), it's a awkwardly balanced yet ultimately fun film that
uses some information already used in film before, in a new... unique fashion.
   Giovanni Ribisi (The Other Sister, The Mod Squad) starts off as a young man
living in the slumps, running an illegal casino out of his apartment, who is
given the opportunity to work as a trainee to become a stock broker at a nearly
invisible (yet very succesful) business place. I have seen him in many
different roles, from comedy as Phoebe's "long-lost" brother on "Friends" to a
mentally challenged man in love in The Other Sister. It's interesting to watch
him seemingly challege his abilites, and, with exception, he proves himself to
have much potential as a rising star in Hollywood.
   His performance here is one of the hilights of the film, even as it declines
in entertaining appeal, even as the film strays into an all-too conspiracy
territory that feels very forced. That being said, I'd like to elaborate.
Watching the trailers for Boiler Room, I interpreted it as a comedy.  Perhaps
this is a lone, rush judgment on my part. But regardless, it is much better
described as a thriller with a bundle of comic relief. 
   Ben Affleck (Good Will Hunting, DOGMA), who's role in this is commonly
compared to that of Alec Baldwin's in the infamous Glengarry GlenRoss (though
in complexity, there's no likeness), provides a few of the film's highest
points as the rough, 27-year-old veteran of the job. Being a, quote-un-quote,
"senior citizen" in the office. He sprays dialogue and wit about in his few on
screen moments ("Anyone who says money is the root of all evil, doesn't f**king
have it."), his dialogue being the film's best scripted sequences. He utters
his lines as steadily as water flowing from a faucet. Smooth and effective, in
essence.
   In the first portion of the film (action prior to the first major
revelation) is found to contain interesting camera angles edited in an arousing
to the senses sort of way. I'd credit the editors for this facet.  Cutting
extremely fast back and forth between countless objects, though not a new idea,
is used in a fascinating atmosphere around the film's overall tone. Also, the
use of constant rap music adds a certain MTV, pop-culture tone to it, also
creating a more fast-paced and exciting texture.
   Though little can be said for the plot. Little originality here. Though this
doesn't neccesarily hurt the film too much, but it quite obviously it does not
help. Going from comedy to thriller is a steep step and one hard to handle.
Generally speaking.
   When watching the film there will be times where you feel some dialogues are
forced into the scene to attempt to add an impact, at other times you'll be
bored. But for the most part, and at most times, you'll be reasonably
interested in the action at hand and will be enjoying yourself. That's what
this film is. An enjoyable movie going experience. Nothing great. Nothing
classic or memorable. Simply an arguably good time with a cool punchline.
Check out the new and improved Movie Page.
Better quality, easier to load, more reviews.
Visit us here at http://moviepage.hypermart.net/
Check out reviews, articles and movie news.
***MoVIefFrEaK***

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
Susan Granger's review of "BOILER ROOM" (New Line Cinema)
If you've ever responded to a telephone solicitation, be
prepared for an eye-opener! This disturbing, cautionary story about a
stock scam takes you into the infamous "boiler room" where
twentysomething millionaires are made overnight.  They're Gen-Xers who
want the adrenaline rush of easy money. So when Seth, a 19 year-old
college dropout played by Giovanni Ribisi (Saving Private Ryan),
realizes that his father, a judge (Ron Rivkin), has caught onto the
illegal casino he's been running out of his Queens apartment, he's
recruited into the inner sanctum of a fly-by-night Long Island
brokerage firm named J.T. Marlin (a name chosen because it sounds like
J.P. Morgan) by Ben Affleck (Dogma). After a glimpse of his boss's 355
canary-yellow Ferrari and an eye-popping indoctrination, he becomes a
stockjock-in-training, learning how to hustle unsuspecting investors
over the phone. "Never pitch the bitch," he's instructed, meaning that
women ask too many questions. Seth's a money-hungry natural - glib and
greedy.  And he enjoys hanging out with his foul-mouthed cohorts -
"They could sell bubble-gum in the lock-jaw ward in Bellevue" - not to
mention the firm's enigmatic receptionist, Nia Long, his "chocolate
love." But soon his insatiable curiosity gets him into trouble with
the law, as he discovers exactly how his colleagues are getting richer
as their customers are getting poorer. First-time writer/director Ben
Younger was intrigued by the remarkable statistic that one out of
every 36 working Americans is a millionaire, so he created this
timely, high-wire drama about today's mega-fortune-hunters. On the
Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, Boiler Room heats up to a searing,
shocking 7.  Just remember: when a stranger calls, trying to sell you
stock, hang up!
